Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1074
Temporary licensure; expiration dates; extension.

Licensure as a temporary practitioner shall expire eight weeks following the date of issuance or upon receipt of examination results, whichever occurs first. The department may extend the license an additional eight weeks.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 66;

Laws 1987, LB 543, § 13;

Laws 1995, LB 83, § 32;

Laws 2002, LB 241, § 28;

Laws 2004, LB 906, § 24;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 29;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-3,105;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 336;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 23.